Illinois, session 104th, SB695.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interstate Contracts for Mental Health 5Disorder Treatment Act is amended by changing Section 1 as 6follows: 7    (405 ILCS 130/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Interstate Contracts for Mental Health Disorder Treatment Act.10(Source: P.A. 102-371, eff. 1-1-22.)